Utah statutes.
62A-5a-101.   Policy statement.

It is the policy of this state that all agencies that provide services to persons with disabilities:

(1)  coordinate and ensure that services and supports are provided in a cost-effective manner.  It is the intent of the Legislature that services and supports provided under this chapter be coordinated to meet the individual needs of persons with disabilities; and

(2)  whenever possible, regard an individual's personal choices concerning services and supports that are best suited to his individual needs and that promote his independence, productivity, and integration in community life.

